Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3402
Publication of material; purpose; identity of person confidential.

The Department of Health and Human Services, the Nebraska Medical Association or any of its allied medical societies, the Nebraska Association of Hospitals and Health Systems, any inhospital staff committee, or any joint venture of such entities shall use or publish the material specified in section 71-3401 only for the purpose of advancing medical research or medical education in the interest of reducing morbidity or mortality, except that a summary of such studies may be released by any such group for general publication. In all events the identity of any person whose condition or treatment has been studied shall be confidential and shall not be revealed under any circumstances.

Laws 1961, c. 347, § 2, p. 1106;

Laws 1992, LB 860, § 5;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 45;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 647;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 562.